Washington statutes.
RCW 15.88.190

Commission must assist legislative gift center—Selection of Washington wines.

The commission must assist the legislative gift center in selecting the Washington wines the legislative gift center will sell as provided in RCW 44.73.015.

[ 2009 c 228 s 4.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2009 c 228: See note following RCW 66.12.195.